Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3435
Civil action; authorized; appropriate relief.

A person aggrieved by the intentional or knowing disclosure of confidential information in violation of the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act by a local team, its members, or a person in attendance at a local team meeting may bring a civil action for appropriate relief against the person who committed such violation. Appropriate relief in an action under this section shall include:

(1) Damages;

(2) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as may be appropriate; and

(3) Reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 92.